Utah statutes.
77-38a-204.   Financial declaration by defendant.

(1) (a)  The Judicial Council shall design and publish a financial declaration form to be completed by a defendant in a case where the prosecutor has indicated that restitution may be ordered.

(b)  The financial declaration form shall:

(i)  require a defendant to disclose all assets, income, and financial liabilities of the defendant, including:

(A)  real property;

(B)  vehicles;

(C)  precious metals or gems;

(D)  jewelry with a value of $1,000 or more;

(E)  other personal property with a value of $1,000 or more;

(F)  bank account balances;

(G)  cash;

(H)  salary, wages, commission, tips, and business income;

(I)  pensions and annuities;

(J)  intellectual property;

(K)  accounts receivable;

(L)  accounts payable;

(M)  mortgages, loans, and other debts; and

(N)  restitution that has been ordered, and not fully paid, in other cases; and

(ii)  state that a false statement made in the financial declaration form is punishable as a class B misdemeanor under Section 76-8-504.

(2)  A defendant shall, before sentencing, or earlier if ordered by the court, complete the financial declaration described in Subsection (1).



Enacted by Chapter 74, 2013 General Session

